Hawaii statutes.
§329-37 Filing requirements.
All persons registered to manufacture, distribute, conduct reverse
distribution, or dispense controlled substances and all persons who transport,
warehouse, or otherwise handle controlled substances, shall file with the department
of public safety on forms and within the time and manner prescribed by the
department of public safety, copies of order, receipt and distribution of
schedule I and schedule II controlled substances and other controlled
substances designated by the department of public safety, showing the amounts
of such controlled substances ordered, received, distributed, transported,
warehoused, or otherwise handled. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 281,
§10; am L 2016, c 218, §11]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next